Colorado, session 2026A, HB1140.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 2-2-328 as
follows:
2-2-328. Committees of reference - local government impact
hearing - legislative measures - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "LEGISLATIVE LEADERSHIP" MEANS THE SPEAKER OF THE
-2- HB26-1140

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, THE MINORITY LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES, THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE, AND THE MINORITY
LEADER OF THE SENATE.
(b) "LOCAL GOVERNMENT" MEANS A COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY,
OR MUNICIPALITY.
(c) "LOCAL GOVERNMENT IMPACT HEARING" MEANS A DEDICATED
TIME THAT IS AT LEAST ONE HOUR AND NOT MORE THAN TWO HOURS AT
THE BEGINNING OF A SCHEDULED COMMITTEE HEARING FOR A LEGISLATIVE
MEASURE DURING WHICH ONE OR MORE LOCAL GOVERNMENTS OR
STATEWIDE ORGANIZATIONS THAT REPRESENT LOCAL GOVERNMENTS MAY
PRESENT TESTIMONY TO THE COMMITTEE REGARDING THE POTENTIAL
EFFECTS OF THE LEGISLATIVE MEASURE ON LOCAL GOVERNMENTS WITHIN
THE STATE.
(2) (a) COMMENCING WITH THE FIRST REGULAR SESSION OF THE
SEVENTY-SIXTH GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND DURING EACH REGULAR
LEGISLATIVE SESSION THEREAFTER, THE STAFF OF THE LEGISLATIVE
COUNCIL SHALL FACILITATE A LOCAL GOVERNMENT IMPACT HEARING ON
ANY LEGISLATIVE MEASURE SELECTED TO HAVE SUCH A HEARING BY A
MEMBER OF THE LEGISLATIVE LEADERSHIP PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(b) EACH MEMBER OF THE LEGISLATIVE LEADERSHIP MAY SELECT
UP TO FIVE LEGISLATIVE MEASURES DURING A REGULAR LEGISLATIVE
SESSION TO HAVE A LOCAL GOVERNMENT IMPACT HEARING IN THE
MEMBER'S RESPECTIVE CHAMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY. A MEMBER
OF THE LEGISLATIVE LEADERSHIP MAY SELECT A LEGISLATIVE MEASURE TO
HAVE A LOCAL GOVERNMENT IMPACT HEARING BASED ON THE MEMBER'S
PREFERENCE OR IN RESPONSE TO A REQUEST RECEIVED BY THE MEMBER
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(c) OF THIS SECTION.
-3- HB26-1140

(c) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, STATEWIDE ORGANIZATION THAT
REPRESENTS LOCAL GOVERNMENTS, OR OTHER INTERESTED PARTY MAY
CONTACT A MEMBER OF THE LEGISLATIVE LEADERSHIP TO REQUEST THAT
THE MEMBER SELECT A LEGISLATIVE MEASURE TO HAVE A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT IMPACT HEARING. IF THE MEMBER OF LEGISLATIVE
LEADERSHIP SELECTS A LEGISLATIVE MEASURE TO HAVE A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT IMPACT HEARING, THE MEMBER MUST:
(I) DETERMINE WHICH COMMITTEE OF REFERENCE IN THE
MEMBER'S CHAMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY WILL HOLD THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT IMPACT HEARING IF THE LEGISLATIVE MEASURE IS ASSIGNED
TO MORE THAN ONE COMMITTEE OF REFERENCE; AND
(II) NOTIFY THE CHAIR OF THE APPLICABLE COMMITTEE OF
REFERENCE AND THE STAFF OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL, PRIOR TO THE
SCHEDULED LEGISLATIVE HEARING IN THE APPLICABLE COMMITTEE OF
REFERENCE, THAT THE LEGISLATIVE MEASURE WILL HAVE A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT IMPACT HEARING.
(d) IF THE STAFF OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL RECEIVES
NOTIFICATION FROM A MEMBER OF THE LEGISLATIVE LEADERSHIP
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(c) OF THIS SECTION, THE STAFF OF THE
LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL SHALL INCLUDE THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT IMPACT
HEARING, INCLUDING THE LENGTH OF THE HEARING, ON THE CALENDAR AS
PART OF THE REGULARLY SCHEDULED LEGISLATIVE HEARING FOR THE
LEGISLATIVE MEASURE IN THE APPLICABLE COMMITTEE OF REFERENCE.
(3) (a) THE CHAIR OF THE APPLICABLE LEGISLATIVE COMMITTEE
OF REFERENCE SHALL DETERMINE THE LENGTH OF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT
IMPACT HEARING, SO LONG AS THE SCHEDULED LOCAL GOVERNMENT
IMPACT HEARING IS AT LEAST ONE HOUR AND NOT MORE THAN TWO
-4- HB26-1140

HOURS.
(b) DURING THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT IMPACT HEARING, ANY
LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR STATEWIDE ORGANIZATION THAT REPRESENTS
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS MAY PROVIDE TESTIMONY REGARDING THE IMPACT
OF THE LEGISLATIVE MEASURE ON LOCAL GOVERNMENTS FOR THE
DURATION OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT IMPACT HEARING WITHOUT OTHER
LIMITATIONS ON THE LENGTH OF TESTIMONY.
(c) WHEN THE TIME ALLOTTED FOR THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
IMPACT HEARING HAS EXPIRED OR WHEN ALL OF THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS OR STATEWIDE ORGANIZATIONS THAT REPRESENT LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS ARE FINISHED WITH THEIR TESTIMONY, WHICHEVER
OCCURS FIRST, THE COMMITTEE SHALL PROCEED WITH REGULAR PUBLIC
TESTIMONY FOR THE LEGISLATIVE MEASURE, AND THE CHAIR OF THE
COMMITTEE MAY IMPOSE TIME LIMITATIONS OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS ON
SUCH TESTIMONY THAT ARE IN THE NORMAL COURSE OF THE COMMITTEE'S
BUSINESS.
(d) ANY LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR STATEWIDE ORGANIZATION THAT
REPRESENTS LOCAL GOVERNMENTS MAY PROVIDE ADDITIONAL TESTIMONY
REGARDING THE SAME LEGISLATIVE MEASURE DURING THE REGULAR
PUBLIC TESTIMONY PERIOD FOR THE COMMITTEE.
(4) NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 1, 2026, AND NO LATER THAN
DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE DIRECTOR OF RESEARCH OF
THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL SHALL DEVELOP AND MEMORIALIZE IN A
LETTER TO THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL,
PROCEDURES FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
-5- HB26-1140

ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-6- HB26-1140